Missouri, session 2026, SB1740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 208.1375, to read as
follows:
208.1375. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Prepaid mobile device", a cellular telephone or
other communication device for which the mobile device user
purchases a set allotment of wireless communication services;
(2) "Shelters for victims of domestic violence", the
same meaning as in section 135.550;
(3) "Wireless communication services", any mobile
service that is provided for profit and makes interconnected
service available to the public.
2. Subject to appropriation, the department of social
services shall implement a pilot project to purchase prepaid
mobile devices and distribute those devices through grants
to shelters for victims of domestic violence for the
purposing of redistributing those devices to victims of
domestic violence for personal use. The department shall
develop a grant application for shelters to utilize to apply

SB 1740 2
for the devices, including a requirement that the shelters
ensure that the devices are distributed to those victims in
greatest need of a prepaid mobile device. The department
shall distribute the devices in a manner that rural and
urban shelters across the state receive an equal allotment
based on need.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Domestic Violence Shelter Cell Phone Fund", which shall
consist of moneys collected under this section and any
grants, donations, gifts, and bequests made to it. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund
shall be used solely by the department for the purpose of
administering the provisions of this section, including the
distribution of prepaid mobile devices to shelters.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
and administer the pilot project described in this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This

SB 1740 3
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
5. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset on August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
✓